Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Transit deleted text begin operatorsdeleted text end new text begin workersnew text end . (a) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if (1) the person assaults a transit deleted text begin operatordeleted text end new text begin workernew text end , or intentionally throws or otherwise transfers bodily fluids onto a transit deleted text begin operatordeleted text end new text begin workernew text end ; and (2) the transit deleted text begin operatordeleted text end new text begin workernew text end is deleted text begin acting in the course of the operator's duties and is operating a transit vehicle, aboard a transit vehicle, or otherwise responsible for a transit vehicledeleted text end new text begin engaged in the performance of the worker's dutiesnew text end . A person convicted under this paragraph may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 364 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $3,000, or both. (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, "transit deleted text begin operatordeleted text end new text begin workernew text end " means deleted text begin a driver or operator of a transit vehicle that is used to provide any of the following services:deleted text end new text begin an employee, contractor, or volunteer working in public transportation or transit as defined under section 473.121, subdivision 19.new text end deleted text begin (1) public transportation, as defined in section 174.22, subdivision 7; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) light rail transit service; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) special transportation service under section 473.386, whether provided by the Metropolitan Council or by other providers under contract with the council; or deleted text end deleted text begin (4) commuter rail service. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end